Idaho statutes. TITLE 33 EDUCATION
CHAPTER 41
INTERSTATE COMPACTS

Section.

33-4101. Interstate compact for education enacted into law.

The Interstate Compact for Education established by the Education Commission of the States is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all other jurisdictions legally joining therein, in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I—PURPOSE AND POLICY

It is the purpose of this compact to:

It is the policy of this compact to encourage and promote local and state initiative in the development, maintenance, improvement and administration of educational systems and institutions in a manner which will accord with the needs and advantages of diversity among localities and states.

The party states recognize that each of them has an interest in the quality and quantity of education furnished in each of the other states, as well as in the excellence of its own educational systems and institutions, because of the highly mobile character of individuals within the nation, and because the products and services contributing to the health, welfare and economic advancement of each state are supplied in significant part by persons educated in other states.

Establish and maintain close cooperation and understanding among executive, legislative, professional, educational and lay leadership on a nationwide basis at the state and local levels.

Provide a forum for the discussion, development, crystallization and recommendation of public policy alternatives in the field of education.

Provide a clearing house of information on matters relating to educational problems and how they are being met in different places throughout the nation, so that the executive and legislative branches of state government and of local communities may have ready access to the experience and records of the entire country, and so that both lay and professional groups in the field of education may have additional avenues for the sharing of experience and the interchange of ideas in the formation of public policy in education.

Facilitate the improvement of state and local educational systems so that all of them will be able to meet adequate and desirable goals in a society which requires continuous qualitative and quantitative advance in educational opportunities, methods and facilities.

ARTICLE II—STATE DEFINED

As used in this compact, “state” means a state, territory or possession of the United States, the District of Columbia, or the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico.

ARTICLE III—THE COMMISSION

The Education Commission of the States, hereinafter called “the commission,” is hereby established. The commission shall consist of seven members representing each party state. One of such members shall be the governor; two shall be members of the state legislature selected by its respective houses and serving in such manner as the legislature may determine; and four shall be appointed by and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless the laws of the state otherwise provide. If the laws of a state prevent legislators from serving on the commission, six members shall be appointed and serve at the pleasure of the governor, unless the laws of the state otherwise provide. In addition to any other principles or requirements which a state may establish for the appointment and service of its members of the commission, the guiding principle for the composition of the membership on the commission from each party state shall be that the members representing such state shall, by virtue of their training, experience, knowledge or affiliations be in a position collectively to reflect broadly the interests of the state government, higher education, the state education system, local education, lay and professional, public and non-public educational leadership. Of those appointees, one shall be the head of a state agency or institution, designated by the governor, having responsibility for one or more programs of public education. In addition to the members of the commission representing the party states, there may be not to exceed ten non-voting commissioners selected by the steering committee for terms of one year. Such commissioners shall represent leading national organizations of professional educators or persons concerned with educational administration.
B. The members of the commission shall be entitled to one vote each on the commission. No action of the commission shall be binding unless taken at a meeting at which a majority of the total number of votes on the commission are cast in favor thereof. Action of the commission shall be only at a meeting at which a majority of the commissioners are present. The commission shall meet at least once a year. In its bylaws, and subject to such directions and limitations as may be contained therein, the commission may delegate the exercise of any of its powers to the steering committee or the executive director, except for the power to approve budgets or requests for appropriations, the power to make policy recommendations pursuant to Article IV and adoption of the annual report pursuant to Article III (J).

C. The commission shall have a seal.

D. The commission shall elect annually, from among its members a chairman, who shall be a governor, a vice chairman and a treasurer. The commission shall provide for the appointment of an executive director. Such executive director shall serve at the pleasure of the commission, and together with the treasurer and such other personnel as the commission may deem appropriate shall be bonded in such amount as the commission shall determine. The executive director shall be secretary.

E. Irrespective of the civil service, personnel or other merit system laws of any of the party states, the executive director subject to the approval of the steering committee shall appoint, remove or discharge such personnel as may be necessary for the performance of the functions of the commission, and shall fix the duties and compensation of such personnel. The commission in its bylaws shall provide for the personnel policies and programs of the commission.

F. The commission may borrow, accept or contract for the services of personnel from any party jurisdiction, the United States, or any subdivision or agency of the aforementioned governments, or from any agency of two or more of the party jurisdictions or their subdivisions.

G. The commission may accept for any of its purposes and functions under this compact any and all donations, and grants of money, equipment, supplies, materials and services, conditional or otherwise, from any state, the United States, or any other governmental agency, or from any person, firm, association, foundation, or corporation, and may receive, utilize and dispose of the same. Any donation or grant accepted by the commission pursuant to this paragraph or services borrowed pursuant to paragraph (F) of this Article shall be reported in the annual report of the commission. Such report shall include the nature, amount and conditions, if any, of the donation, grant, or services borrowed, and the identity of the donor or lender.
H. The commission may establish and maintain such facilities as may be necessary for the transacting of its business. The commission may acquire, hold, and convey real and personal property and any interest therein.

I. The commission shall adopt bylaws for the conduct of its business and shall have the power to amend and rescind these bylaws. The commission shall publish its bylaws in convenient form and shall file a copy thereof and a copy of any amendment thereto, with the appropriate agency or officer in each of the party states.

J. The commission annually shall make to the governor and legislature of each party state a report covering the activities of the commission for the preceding year. The commission may make such additional reports as it may deem desirable.

ARTICLE IV—POWERS

In addition to authority conferred on the commission by other provisions of the compact, the commission shall have authority to:

Collect, correlate, analyze and interpret information and data concerning educational needs and resources.

Encourage and foster research in all aspects of education, but with special reference to the desirable scope of instruction, organization, administration, and instructional methods and standards employed or suitable for employment in public educational systems.

Develop proposals for adequate financing of education as a whole and at each of its many levels.

Conduct or participate in research of the types referred to in this Article in any instance where the commission finds that such research is necessary for the advancement of the purposes and policies of this compact, utilizing fully the resources of national associations, regional compact organizations for higher education, and other agencies and institutions, both public and private.

Formulate suggested policies and plans for the improvement of public education as a whole, or for any segment thereof, and make recommendations with respect thereto available to the appropriate governmental units, agencies and public officials.

Do such other things as may be necessary or incidental to the administration of any of its authority or functions pursuant to this compact.

ARTICLE V—COOPERATION WITH FEDERAL GOVERNMENT

If the laws of the United States specifically so provide, or if administrative provision is made therefor within the federal government, the United States may be represented on the commission by not to exceed ten representatives. Any such representative or representatives of the United States shall be appointed and serve in such manner as may be provided by or pursuant to federal law, and may be drawn from any one or more branches of the federal government, but no such representative shall have a vote on the commission.

The commission may provide information and make recommendations to any executive or legislative agency or officer of the federal government concerning the common educational policies of the states, and may advise with any such agencies or officers concerning any matter of mutual interest.

The commission may establish such additional committees as its bylaws may provide.

ARTICLE VI—COMMITTEES

A. To assist in the expeditious conduct of its business when the full commission is not meeting, the commission shall elect a steering committee of thirty-two members which, subject to the provisions of this compact and consistent with the policies of the commission, shall be constituted and function as provided in the bylaws of the commission. One-fourth of the voting membership of the steering committee shall consist of governors, one-fourth shall consist of legislators, and the remainder shall consist of other members of the commission. A federal representative on the commission may serve with the steering committee, but without vote. The voting members of the steering committee shall serve for terms of two years, except that members elected to the first steering committee of the commission shall be elected as follows: sixteen for one year and sixteen for two years. The chairman, vice chairman, and treasurer of the commission shall be members of the steering committee and, anything in this paragraph to the contrary notwithstanding, shall serve during their continuance in these offices. Vacancies in the steering committee shall not affect its authority to act, but the commission at its next regularly ensuing meeting following the occurrence of any vacancy shall fill it for the unexpired term. No person shall serve more than two terms as a member of the steering committee; provided that service for a partial term of one year or less shall not be counted toward the two term limitation.

B. The commission may establish advisory and technical committees composed of state, local, and federal officials, and private persons to advise it with respect to any one or more of its functions. Any advisory or technical committee may, on request of the states concerned, be established to consider any matter of special concern to two or more of the party states.

ARTICLE VII—FINANCE

The commission shall advise the governor or designated officer or officers of each party state of its budget and estimated expenditures for such period as may be required by the laws of that party state. Each of the commission’s budgets of estimated expenditures shall contain specific recommendations of the amount or amounts to be appropriated by each of the party states.

The total amount of appropriation requests under any budget shall be apportioned among the party states. In making such apportionment, the commission shall devise and employ a formula which takes equitable account of the populations and per capita income levels of the party states.

The commission shall not pledge the credit of any party states [state]. The commission may meet any of its obligations in whole or in part with funds available to it pursuant to Article III (G) of this compact, provided that the commission takes specific action setting aside such funds prior to incurring an obligation to be met in whole or in part in such manner. Except where the commission makes use of funds available to it pursuant to Article III (G) thereof, the commission shall not incur any obligation prior to the allotment of funds by the party states adequate to meet the same.

The commission shall keep accurate accounts of all receipts and disbursements. The receipts and disbursements of the commission shall be subject to the audit and accounting procedures established by its bylaws. However, all receipts and disbursements of funds handled by the commission shall be audited yearly by a qualified public accountant, and the report of the audit shall be included in and become part of the annual reports of the commission.

The accounts of the commission shall be open at any reasonable time for inspection by duly constituted officers of the party states and by any persons authorized by the commission.
F. Nothing contained herein shall be construed to prevent commission compliance with laws relating to audit or inspection of accounts by or on behalf of any government contributing to the support of the commission.

ARTICLE VIII—ELIGIBLE PARTIES; ENTRY INTO AND WITHDRAWAL

This compact shall have as eligible parties all states, territories, and possessions of the United States, the District of Columbia, and the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico. In respect of any such jurisdiction not having a governor, the term, “governor,” as used in this compact, shall mean the closest equivalent official of such jurisdiction.

Any state or other eligible jurisdiction may enter into this compact and it shall become binding thereon when it has adopted the same: provided that in order to enter into initial effect, adoption by at least ten eligible party jurisdictions shall be required.

Adoption of the compact may be either by enactment thereof or by adherence thereto by the governor; provided that in the absence of enactment, adherence by the governor shall be sufficient to make his state a party only until December 31, 1967. During any period when a state is participating in this compact through gubernatorial action, the governor shall appoint those persons who, in addition to himself, shall serve as the members of the commission from his state, and shall provide to the commission an equitable share of the financial support of the commission from any source available to him.

Except for a withdrawal effective on December 31, 1967 in accordance with paragraph C of this Article, any party state may withdraw from this compact by enacting a statute repealing the same, but no such withdrawal shall take effect until one year after the governor of the withdrawing state has given notice in writing of the withdrawal to the governors of all other party states. No withdrawal shall affect any liability already incurred by or chargeable to a party state prior to the time of such withdrawal.

ARTICLE IX—CONSTRUCTION AND SEVERABILITY

This compact shall be liberally construed so as to effectuate the purposes thereof. The provisions of this compact shall be severable and if any phrase, clause, sentence or provision of this compact is declared to be contrary to the constitution of any state or of the United States, or the application thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance is held invalid, the validity of the remainder of this compact and the applicability thereof to any government, agency, person or circumstance shall not be affected thereby. If this compact shall be held contrary to the constitution of any state participating therein, the compact shall remain in full force and effect as to the state affected as to all severable matters.

33-4102. Establishing the Idaho Education Council.

There is hereby established the “Idaho Education Council” composed of the members of the “Education Commission of the States” representing this state, and eight other persons appointed by the governor for terms of three years. Such other person shall be selected so as to be broadly representative of professional and lay interest within this state having the responsibilities for, knowledge with respect to, and interest in educational matters. The chairman shall be designated by the governor from among its members. The council shall meet on the call of its chairman or at the request of a majority of its members, but in any event the council shall meet not less than three times in each year. The council may consider any and all matters relating to recommendations of the education commission of the states and the activities of the members in representing the state thereon.

33-4103. Designating the state agency to receive and file bylaws.

Pursuant to Article III (I) of the compact, the commission shall file a copy of its bylaws and any amendment thereto with the state board of education.

33-4104. Interstate agreement on qualification of educational personnel. — The interstate agreement on qualification of educational personnel is hereby enacted into law and entered into with all jurisdictions legally joining therein as outlined in the national association of state directors of teacher education and certification (NASDTEC) interstate agreement, 2010

2015 in the form substantially as follows:

ARTICLE I, PURPOSE.

The purpose of this interstate agreement is to provide a mechanism to inform the membership and the public of jurisdiction-specific requirements for educator licensure in each member jurisdiction.

ARTICLE II, ASSUMPTIONS.

Education is a regulated profession.

Each member jurisdiction has the authority to establish professional and ethical standards for preparation, licensure and continuing development of educators.

Each member jurisdiction has the responsibility to adhere to federal requirements and guidelines regarding the qualification of educators.

Understanding licensure requirements of the different member jurisdictions facilitates professional educator mobility.

The term “reciprocity” is often inappropriately applied to educator mobility between member jurisdictions.

As licensure criteria differ from member jurisdiction to member jurisdiction, an educator’s license from one (1) member jurisdiction is not automatically “exchanged” for a license in another member jurisdiction.

Minimum essential components of an approved educator preparation program are completion of a:

Bachelor’s degree, either prior to admission to the program or as part of the program;

Supervised clinical practice; and

Planned program of study.

Recognition of national certification of educators, for example, the national board for professional teaching standards, is at the discretion of member jurisdictions.

The terms defined in this interstate agreement provide a common vocabulary, which member jurisdictions agree to use in disseminating information nationally and internationally.

The interstate agreement is not intended to alter, amend or regulate individual member jurisdiction licensure requirements.

A member jurisdiction may impose additional components to meet its own standards.

ARTICLE III, DEFINITIONS.

For purposes of this interstate agreement, the following terms are defined as:

“Accredited institution” means a college or university which awards a baccalaureate or higher degree and, if located within the United States, is fully accredited by one (1) of the following regional accrediting bodies:
(a) Middle states association of colleges and schools;

“Administrator” means an educator whose primary duties may include:

The supervision of programs or curriculum; or

Supervision or management of a local educational agency, a school building, a school program or a school system.

“Approved program” means a planned program of study leading to licensure in the appropriate member jurisdiction. Approved programs may be either traditional or nontraditional. A nontraditional program is a post-baccalaureate program in which the candidate may be employed as an educator prior to completion of the program, as defined by the United States department of education (USDOE).

“Educator” is categorized as a teacher, administrator or support professional who may be required by the member jurisdiction to hold a license. A member jurisdiction may recognize additional categories of licensure (e.g., career and technical educators) not addressed by this interstate agreement.

“Experience” means employment and licensure as required by the member jurisdiction.

“Jurisdiction-specific requirement” (JSR) means any criterion beyond the minimum essential components required by a member jurisdiction for licensure. The following is a noninclusive list of JSRs:

Grade-point average;

Testing or other forms of assessment;

Mentoring;

Supervised and evaluated pre-service or professional experience;

Course delivery methodology;

Program approval comparability;

Specific coursework;

Valid license, as defined by the receiving member jurisdiction;

Post-baccalaureate coursework or degrees;

Continuing professional development;

Moral fitness or character; or

Citizenship.

“Stages of administrator license” are described below and are general categories of licensure. Member jurisdictions may or may not offer these stages of licensure or require licensure to be eligible for certain school administrator work assignments.

“Stage 1 administrator license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a bachelor’s degree, has met approved school administrator preparation program admission requirements, but has not met the jurisdiction-specific requirements of the issuing member jurisdiction.

“Stage 2 administrator license” means a license issued to an individual who has completed an approved school administrator preparation program, but has not met the jurisdiction-specific requirements for a stage 3 license of the issuing member jurisdiction.

“Stage 3 administrator license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a master’s degree and has met all jurisdiction-specific requirements for licensure, including endorsements when applicable.

“Stages of teacher licensure” are described below and are general categories of licensure. Member jurisdictions may or may not have licenses available in each stage.
(a) “Stage 1 teacher license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a bachelor’s degree, has met approved teacher preparation program admission requirements, but has not met the jurisdiction-specific requirements of the issuing member jurisdiction.

“License” means certificate, credential or other similar term designated by the member jurisdiction.

“Member jurisdiction” means an entity which is a voting member of NASDTEC.

“School” means an institution, other than a home school, which offers instruction for students of any grade, from birth through grade 12, which satisfies the compulsory attendance requirements of the member jurisdiction in which the institution is located.

“Support professional” means a person other than a teacher or administrator who is required to hold an educator license based upon at least a bachelor’s degree.

“Teacher” means a person whose primary responsibility is to instruct students or as otherwise defined by the member jurisdiction.

(b) New England association of schools and colleges;

(c) North central association of colleges and schools;

(d) Northwest commission on colleges and universities;

(e) Southern association of colleges and schools; and

(f) Western association of schools and colleges.

If the college or university does not have regional accreditation as detailed above, consideration of the educator for licensure is at the discretion of the member jurisdiction.

Teacher

Traditional Program

Nontraditional Program

Rigorous Admission Standards

Yes

Yes, including a bachelor’s degree earned prior to admission

Conferred Degree Upon Program Completion

Yes or No

Yes or No

Delivered by an Institution of Higher Education (IHE)

Yes

Yes or No

Supervised Clinical Practice

Yes

Yes, but may differ from a traditional program

May Be Employed As An Educator While Completing Program

No

Yes

Administrator

Traditional Program

Nontraditional Program

Rigorous Admission Standards

Yes, including a bachelor’s degree or higher earned prior to admission

Yes, including a bachelor’s degree or higher earned prior to admission

Conferred Degree Upon Program Completion

Yes or No

Yes or No

Delivered by an IHE
Yes

Yes or No

Supervised Clinical Practice

Yes

Yes, but may differ from a traditional program

May Be Employed As An Educator While Completing Program

Yes or No

Yes

A program approved in one (1) member jurisdiction may not lead to licensure in another member jurisdiction.

(b) “Stage 2 teacher license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a bachelor’s degree, has completed an approved teacher preparation program, but has not met the jurisdiction-specific requirements for a stage 3 license of the issuing member jurisdiction.

(c) “Stage 3 teacher license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a bachelor’s degree, has completed an approved teacher preparation program and has met all jurisdiction-specific requirements of the issuing member jurisdiction.

(d) “Stage 4 teacher license” means a license issued to an individual who holds a minimum of a master’s degree or the equivalent, has completed an approved teacher preparation program and has met any jurisdiction-specific requirements beyond those required for the stage 3 license of the issuing member jurisdiction.

ARTICLE IV, DUTIES OF MEMBER JURISDICTIONS.

In signing this interstate agreement, member jurisdictions agree to:

Adopt and enforce quality standards for approved programs;

Maintain and publish a current listing of programs approved within the member jurisdiction;

Apply jurisdiction-specific requirements equitably to applicants completing approved programs in any other member jurisdiction;

Agree in principle to the “Assumptions” set forth in this interstate agreement;

Agree in principle to the “Minimum Essential Components”;

In addition to signing the NASDTEC “Interstate Agreement for Educator Licensure,” each member jurisdiction signs the NASDTEC “Educator Information Clearinghouse Agreement” agreeing to notify the NASDTEC “Educator Information Clearinghouse” immediately upon denial, suspension, revocation or surrender of an educator’s license for reasons other than failing to meet academic requirements.

ARTICLE V, PROCEDURE FOR MEMBER PARTICIPATION.

Each member jurisdiction shall complete a jurisdiction-specific requirement (JSR) index for each educator category in the form and time frame as directed by the NASDTEC executive director.

Each member jurisdiction shall revise the jurisdiction-specific requirement (JSR) index immediately in the event that its licensure criteria are amended or modified.
(3) The NASDTEC executive director shall compile a master index reflecting all member jurisdiction’s jurisdiction-specific requirements for distribution and for posting on the NASDTEC website.

ARTICLE VI, DURATION OF THE INTERSTATE AGREEMENT.

This interstate agreement shall have duration until September 30 of each year ending in a five (5) or a zero (0), unless terminated as provided below. The interstate agreement shall be automatically renewed in the then-current format for each subsequent five (5) year period unless written notice of intent not to renew is given to the executive director of NASDTEC by July 1 of the final year of an interstate agreement period.

A member jurisdiction may withdraw from the interstate agreement upon one (1) year’s written notice to the executive director of NASDTEC, who shall in turn notify all other affected member jurisdictions. It shall be incumbent upon the executive director to notify other member jurisdictions.

ARTICLE VII, MISCELLANEOUS TERMS.

The NASDTEC executive board, by and through the chair of the NASDTEC interstate agreement committee, shall be responsible for administration and interpretation of this interstate agreement.

NASDTEC recognizes the fluidity of educator preparation and licensure laws, regulations and policies in member jurisdictions. It is NASDTEC’s intent to maintain the jurisdiction-specific requirements (JSRs) index as a current and accurate reflection of each member jurisdiction’s requirements. However, circumstances beyond the control of NASDTEC may, on occasion, inhibit the accuracy of the master index. Accordingly, it is recommended that users of the JSR index refer to member jurisdictions’ websites to confirm specific requirements. Further, it is understood that this interstate agreement and the JSR index are provided to facilitate the exchange of information and are not intended to supplant or supersede individual jurisdiction’s authority.

ARTICLE VIII, MEMBER JURISDICTION-SPECIFIC LICENSURE REQUIREMENTS.

Driven by the “Assumptions” identified in Article II of this document, as of October 2010, NASDTEC member jurisdictions recognize the complex nature of the interstate agreement and the public’s need for clear, accurate information when moving from one (1) member jurisdiction to another. Member jurisdictions agree to make “Levels of Licensure” and jurisdiction-specific requirements (JSRs) clear to each other and the public by completing and maintaining the JSR index. This index is intended to provide information to anyone seeking educator licensure in a member jurisdiction, whether prepared through a traditional or nontraditional pathway. It identifies specific requirements beyond the NASDTEC-identified “Minimum Essential Components” for educator preparation. A member jurisdiction’s laws and regulations in place at the time of application for licensure supersede information provided here.

33-4105. “Designated state official.”

The “designated state official” shall be the superintendent of public instruction. The superintendent of public instruction shall enter into contracts pursuant to Article III of the agreement only with the approval of the state board of education.

33-4106. Contracts kept on file — Published.

True copies of all contracts made on behalf of the state of Idaho pursuant to the agreement shall be kept on file with the state board of education. The state board of education shall publish all such contracts in convenient form.